ext/spell/pt_BR.dic
aborrecido/PN
acantonado/PN
acirrado/PN
acondicionado/PN
acéfalo/P
adestrado/PN
admirável/Gsm
aeromodelo/GOT
aerossol/g
aferrolhado/PN
afrouxado/PN
agnóstico/Pot
agourento/P
agradável/GsmD
agravado/PN
aimoré/G
alarme/GOT
aldeão/Gp
aleatório/Pm
alemão/p
alpino/POT
alternado/PM
alto/PSM
aluguel/g
amaciado/PN
amante/GS
amazônico/P
amplo/PSM
amável/GsmD
anacrônico/Po
anarquia/GOT
anel/g
anguloso/GD
anormal/GSMD
antagônico/Pot
antecâmara/G
anterior/GMD
antropocêntrico/Pot
antropologia/TC
antropomórfico/Po
anzol/g
apedrejado/PN
apensado/P
apertado/PS
apologia/GT
aquartelado/PN
aristotélico/Po
armamento/GOT
arrebatador/PM
arredio/P
arrendado/PN
arriscado/PS
arte/GT
ascese/G
associativo/PDO
astigmático/Po
astrologia/GC
atol/g
atraente/GS
atrevido/PMN
atributivo/P
atroz/GD
atávico/Po
autocrático/Po
automático/Pmo
automóvel/Got
autonomia/GT
autoritário/Pmo
aventureiro/PO
bacharel/g
bacteriologia/TC
balanceio/G
banho/GT
barrento/P
batel/g
batismo/Gt
biologia/TC
boca/G
bolchevismo/t
bombeado/PN
bondoso/PM
bordel/g
bravo/PSM
brilhante/GO
brioso/PS
bucólico/Po
buda/OT
bênção/g
cachecol/g
caduco/PD
calcanhar/G
calunioso/PM
calvinismo/t
canibal/GO
capelão/p
capitão/p
caracol/g
cardiologia/TC
caricatura/GT
carinhoso/PM
caro/PS
carretel/g
cartela/G
cascavel/g
catalão/p
central/GO
certo/PSM
charlatão/Gp
chauvinismo/Gt
cheque/G
choroso/P
ciclismo/t
ciente/GM
civil/GMOT
clandestino/PMD
clemente/GS
clerical/GO
climatologia/C
coluna/GT
combate/G
comentário/Gt
comissionário/P
comodismo/Gt
comovedor/Pm
comparativo/PM
comparecido/PN
conectivo/PD
conforme/GDOT
conhecedor/P
conjunto/PM
considerável/Gm
contestante/G
contorção/GO
contrátil/g
convencional/GOT
cordel/g
correto/PSM
corretor/P
cosmopolita/GO
costumeiro/PM
cota/GT
credenciado/PN
crediário/Gt
criminologia/TC
cromático/Po
cronologia/Cm
crucial/G
cruel/gM
czar/GOT
daltônico/Po
dantesco/P
datiloscopia/T
declive/GD
decodificado/PM
deficitário/Pm
delicado/PS
demonologia/C
demão/g
deplorável/Gm
depreciativo/P
dermatologia/TC
desabrochado/PN
descarrilado/PN
desejado/P
desenho/GT
desfalecido/PN
desgracioso/PM
desprendido/PN
desregrado/PN
determinismo/Gt
diaconisa/G
diagonal/GM
diplomático/Pm
direito/POT
discriminativo/P
divino/PS
divisível/PD
diário/Pmt
dobrado/PN
dogmático/Pot
dramático/Pm
duelo/GT
duro/PSM
débil/g
déspota/G
eclético/Po
ecumênico/Po
eficaz/GS
efêmero/P
egiptologia/C
egocêntrico/Pot
eletromagnético/Po
embriologia/TC
eminente/GS
empenhado/PN
encarecido/PN
encefálico/P
endocrinologia/TC
enforcado/PN
entendido/PN
entrincheirado/PN
epicurismo/t
epistemologia/C
epístola/G
erótico/Po
escabroso/PMD
escalonado/PN
escandaloso/PM
escrivão/p
esmaecido/PN
esmagador/Pm
esnobe/GO
espalhado/PN
espanhol/g
espeleologia/C
espiritual/GOT
esquerdo/POT
estatismo/Gt
estilhaço/G
estonteado/PMN
estranho/PM
estreito/GSM
etimologia/TC
etnologia/TCm
evidente/GSM
evolução/GOT
excepcional/GSMD
excitável/GD
expansão/GO
extenso/PS
extravagante/GM
extremo/PMDOT
exótico/Po
falimentar/G
fanático/Pmo
farmacologia/TC
farol/g
farra/GT
fascismo/t
favorito/PO
fechado/PN
feliz/GSMD
fidedigno/PS
filantropia/O
filologia/C
final/GMDT
fino/PS
fisiologia/TCm
flagrante/GM
flexível/GD
fonologia/C
formatação/G
fricoteiro/P
frio/PSM
frágil/g
fundo/POT
futebol/T
futuro/PMOT
futurologia/C
fértil/g
fútil/g
gauchada/G
generoso/PMD
genético/Pm
geocêntrico/Pot
geologia/Cm
gostoso/PS
grafologia/CTm
granel/g
guardião/p
harpa/GT
hedonismo/t
heliocêntrico/Pot
helênico/Pot
hematologia/C
herbácea/G
hermético/Pm
homologia/C
homomorfo/GO
honesto/PMD
honorífico/P
hotel/g
humanitário/Po
humano/PMDOT
iate/GO
ilegível/Gm
iluminismo/t
ilustre/GS
imaginário/Pm
impenhorável/GD
impontual/GMD
improvável/GD
imprudência/G
imunobiologia/TC
imunologia/TC
imóvel/GDo
inadaptável/GD
incomparável/Gm
incompatível/GD
inconstitucional/GMD
indissociável/GD
individual/GMDOT
induzido/PN
inegável/Gm
inesperado/PM
inextinguível/Gm
infeliz/GSMD
inferior/PMD
infiel/g
infundido/P
infungível/GD
insensível/GmD
insuficiente/GM
interoperável/GD
invariável/Gm
inábil/g
irreconciliável/G
irregular/GMD
irresistível/Gm
irretratável/GD
italiano/PO
lacaio/P
lamentável/Gm
legal/GMDOT
legista/G
lençol/g
leve/GSM
lexicologia/C
ligeiro/PM
literal/GMD
luterano/GO
macroeconômico/Pm
madeirado/PN
magnético/Pmo
magnólia/G
malabarismo/Gt
manufaturado/P
marcado/PM
marxismo/t
matemático/Pm
materno/PD
mecanicismo/Gt
mensal/GMDT
mercantil/GMOT
metabólico/Po
meteorologia/TC
metrologia/C
mineralogia/C
moda/GOT
modesto/PS
morfologia/Cm
moroso/PMD
mortal/GMD
motel/g
motociclismo/t
multa/G
módico/P
nacional/GMDOT
narciso/O
nebuloso/PDM
necrologia/C
niilismo/Gt
notável/Gsm
numerado/PM
numeroso/PS
obscurantismo/t
ocioso/PD
octoedro/G
odontologia/C
oftalmologia/TC
ofuscado/PN
ontologia/Cm
ordinário/Pm
oriental/GOT
ortogonal/GD
otorrinolaringologia/CT
pacifismo/t
palestino/P
papel/g
papo/GT
paraestatal/G
parapsicologia/C
parcelado/PMN
partidário/Pmot
patologia/GTCm
penoso/PSM
periscópio/G
permeável/GD
perspicaz/GS
pessimismo/t
piano/GT
pincel/g
pioneiro/PO
platônico/Po
pomposo/PM
ponte/G
poroso/PD
positivo/PMDOT
possível/GmD
pragmático/Pmo
preenchido/PN
prejudicial/GSD
preparatório/Pm
primeiro/PSM
primitivo/PMOT
probo/PD
profundo/PSMD
profético/Pm
progresso/GOT
projétil/g
promontório/G
provinciano/PO
psicologia/Cm
pugilismo/t
puro/PSMOT
pátrio/P
quartel/g
rainha/G
razoável/GsmD
raça/GOT
reatado/PN
reduzido/PS
redução/GOT
regulado/PN
remitente/G
renascentismo/t
renomado/P
renovado/PM
repente/GT
representativo/PD
respeitável/Gs
restabelecido/N
reumático/Po
revel/g
rombo/G
rural/GOT
réptil/g
saboroso/PS
salteado/PM
samba/GT
sarcástico/P
secundário/Pt
sedentário/Po
seguro/PSD
sensível/GmD
separatismo/t
simbólico/Pot
sincero/PD
sincrético/Go
sindical/GOT
singular/GSMD
sistemático/Pm
social/GMOT
sofrido/PN
solo/GT
subsecretário/G
subsidiário/Pm
subutilizado/P
superior/PD
sótão/g
tabagismo/t
tabelião/p
tautologia/GC
taxativo/PM
telepático/Pm
telha/G
tenaz/GSMD
terminologia/GC
topologia/Cm
tradicional/GMOT
transportado/P
traspassado/PN
traumático/Pmo
trivial/GMD
trotskismo/t
unitário/Pmot
urologia/TC
usual/GM
utilitário/Pot
validade/G
vanguarda/GOT
variado/PS
ventilado/PS
veraz/GSD
verossímil/g
vibrátil/g
violento/PSM
visual/GM
voluntário/Pmt
voluptuoso/P
vovô/G
zoologia/C
órgão/g
